Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4704
Form of partition, reclassification, or waiver.

(a) Community-property spouses domiciled in this state may partition or reclassify property to which the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act otherwise would apply. The partition or reclassification must be in a record signed by both community-property spouses.

(b) A community-property spouse domiciled in this state may waive a right granted by the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act only by complying with the law of this state, including this state's choice-of-law rules, applicable to waiver of a spousal property right.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 4.